Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by  section 1, chapter 120,
Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) The Oregon Hatchery  [ Research Center ] Monitoring and Maintenance  Fund is es-
tablished in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.  Interest earned by the
Oregon Hatchery [ Research Center ] Monitoring and Maintenance  Fund shall be credited to the
fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife. The fund shall consist of:
(a) All moneys received from the surcharge on angling licenses imposed by section 3, chapter
734, Oregon Laws 2015; and
(b) All moneys received from  the ad valorem fee imposed by section 4, chapter 734, Oregon Laws
2015.
(2) Moneys in the fund may  be expended only on [ research projects recommended by the Oregon
Hatchery Research Center Board. ]:
(a) Programs to monitor and address impacts of hatcheries on native fish species; and
(b) Work related to maintenance needs at hatcheries.
(3) On a biennial basis, overall expenditures from  the fund must be evenly split between
the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 2.
 Section 3, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended  by section 52, chapter 779,
Oregon Laws 2015, and section 7, chapter 56, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 3. Notwithstanding any other provision  of the wildlife laws [ and during the period begin-
ning January 1, 2016, and ending December 31, 2026 ], of the moneys received from  the sale of the
following licenses, the following amounts shall be deposited in the Oregon Hatchery [ Research  Cen-
ter] Monitoring and Maintenance  Fund:
(1) Resident annual combination license issued under ORS 497.132, $1.
(2) Resident annual angling license issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(a), $1.
(3) Angling and shellfish license to angle  and take shellfish for one day issued under ORS
497.121 (1)(d), $0.50.
(4) Nonresident annual angling license issued under ORS 497.121 (1)(b), $1.50.
(5) Nonresident angling license to angle for seven consecutive days issued under ORS 497.121
(1)(c), $1.50.
Enrolled House Bill 2345 (HB 2345-INTRO) Page 1
SECTION 3.  Section 4, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) In  addition to the ad valorem fee prescribed by law, [ during the period beginning
January 1,  2016, and ending December 31, 2026, ] there shall be paid for each fish species referred
to in ORS  508.505 (1)(a), an additional fee of four cents per pound. The ad valorem fee referred to
in this section is subject to ORS 508.505 to 508.540.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 506.306,  all moneys received by the State Fish and Wildlife Commission
pursuant to  subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited  in the Oregon Hatchery [ Research
Center] Monitoring and Maintenance  Fund.
SECTION 4. (1) The amounts required to be  deposited under section 3, chapter 734,
Oregon Laws 2015, as  amended by section 52, chapter 779, Oregon Laws 2015, section 7,
chapter 56, Oregon Laws 2022, and section 2 of this 2025  Act apply to licenses issued on or
before December 31, 2036.
(2) The additional fee imposed by section 4, chapter 734, Oregon  Laws 2015, as amended
by section 3 of this 2025 Act, applies to fish caught on or before December 31, 2036.
SECTION 5.  Section 7, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  [ (1) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall provide a financial report  quarterly
to the Oregon Hatchery Research Center Board  showing all revenues and deposits to and transfers and
expenditures from the Oregon Hatchery Research Center Fund. ]
[(2)] The [ department] State Department of Fish and Wildlife  shall provide a financial report
annually to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to the environment and na-
tural resources showing all  revenues and deposits to and transfers and expenditures from the
Oregon Hatchery [ Research Center ] Monitoring and Maintenance  Fund.
SECTION 6.  Section 8, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended  by section 53, chapter 779,
Oregon Laws 2015, and section 3, chapter 120, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  [ (1)(a) Sections 4 and  7, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, are  repealed on January  2,
2027.]
[(b) Section 3, chapter 734, Oregon Laws  2015, as amended by section 52, chapter 779, Oregon
Laws 2015, is repealed on January 2, 2027. ]
[(c) Section 1, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by section 1 of this 2017 Act, is repealed
on January 2, 2027. ]
(1)(a) Section 3, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by section 52,  chapter 779,
Oregon Laws 2015, section  7, chapter 56, Oregon Laws 2022, and section 2 of this 2025 Act,
is repealed on January 2, 2037.
(b) Section 4, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as  amended by section 3 of this 2025 Act,
is repealed on January 2, 2037.
(c) Section  1, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by section 1, chapter 120,
Oregon Laws 2017, and section 1 of this 2025 Act, is repealed on January 2, 2039.
(d) Section 7, chapter 734, Oregon Laws 2015, as  amended by section 5 of this 2025 Act,
is repealed on January 2, 2039.
(2) Any balance in the Oregon Hatchery [ Research Center ] Monitoring and Maintenance Fund
that is unexpended and unobligated on the date of the repeal  of section 1, chapter 734, Oregon Laws
2015, and all moneys that would have been deposited in the Oregon Hatchery [ Research  Center ]
Monitoring and Maintenance  Fund had section 1, chapter  734, Oregon Laws 2015, remained in
effect, shall be transferred to and deposited in the  Hatchery Construction Fund, and are appropri-
ated for expenditure as in the case of other moneys in the Hatchery Construction Fund.
SECTION 7. ORS 498.825, 498.827, 498.829, 498.831 and 498.833 are repealed.
Enrolled House Bill 2345 (HB 2345-INTRO) Page 2
Passed by House February 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2345 (HB 2345-INTRO) Page 3